Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this  2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 90.
SECTION 2. (1) A landlord who uses a tenant portal to accept an application shall:
(a)(A) Post a printable copy of the application on the landlord’s website; or
(B) Within seven days following receipt of  a written request by any prospective applicant,
provide a printed or printable copy of the application to the prospective applicant  by mail or
electronic mail.
(b) Process all applications whether received through the tenant portal or outside of the
portal.
(2) If an applicant or  tenant requests an alternative in writing, a landlord may not re-
quire a tenant to use a tenant portal as the sole means to:
(a) Verify identification;
(b) Review and sign addenda or other legal agreements; or
(c) Submit documents relating to the tenancy.
(3) This section does  not prohibit a landlord from entering tenant information into a
tenant portal or otherwise using a tenant portal.
(4) If a landlord fails to comply with this section,  an individual who applied as described
in subsection (1)(b) of this section or requested  an alternative to the tenant portal under
subsection (1)(a) or (2) of this  section is entitled to any damages sustained, or $100, which-
ever is greater.
SECTION 3.
(1) A landlord shall allow a tenant to make payments by  check or other
commercially reasonable methods.
(2) A landlord  may not require a tenant to make payments by debit card, credit card,
electronic check, tenant portal or any other form of electronic payment.
(3) A landlord may not charge a late fee or terminate a  tenancy based on nonpayment
of rent or other charge if a landlord refuses to allow a payment offered by  the tenant under
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 90.100 is amended to read:
90.100. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 1
(1) “Accessory building or structure” means any portable, demountable or permanent  structure,
including but not limited to cabanas, ramadas, storage  sheds, garages, awnings, carports, decks,
steps, ramps, piers and pilings, that is:
(a) Owned and used solely by a tenant of a manufactured dwelling or floating home; or
(b) Provided pursuant to a written rental agreement  for the sole use of and maintenance by a
tenant of a manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(2) “Action” includes recoupment, counterclaim, setoff,  suit in equity and any other proceeding
in which rights are determined, including an action for possession.
(3) “Applicant screening charge” means any payment of money required by  a landlord of an
applicant prior to entering into  a rental agreement with that applicant for a residential dwelling
unit, the purpose of  which is to pay the cost of processing an application for a rental agreement for
a residential dwelling unit.
(4) “Attorney” includes an associate licensee of the  Oregon State Bar practicing law within the
licensee’s approved scope of practice.
(5) “Bias crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.380.
(6) “Building and housing codes” includes any law, ordinance  or governmental regulation con-
cerning fitness for habitation, or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use  or ap-
pearance of any premises or dwelling unit.
(7) “Carbon monoxide alarm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 105.836.
(8) “Carbon monoxide source” has the meaning given that term in ORS 105.836.
(9) “Conduct” means the commission of an act or the failure to act.
(10) “DBH” means the  diameter at breast height, which is measured as the width of a standing
tree at four and one-half feet above the ground on the uphill side.
(11) “Dealer” means any person in the  business of selling, leasing or distributing new or used
manufactured dwellings  or floating homes to persons who purchase or lease a manufactured dwelling
or floating home for use as a residence.
(12) “Domestic violence” means:
(a) Abuse between family or household members, as those terms are defined in ORS 107.705; or
(b) Abuse, as defined in ORS 107.705, between partners in a dating relationship.
(13) “Drug and alcohol free housing” means a dwelling unit described in ORS 90.243.
(14) “Dwelling unit” means a structure or the part of a structure that is used as a  home, resi-
dence or sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who
maintain a common household. “Dwelling unit” regarding a person  who rents a space for a manu-
factured dwelling or recreational vehicle  or regarding a person who rents moorage space for a
floating home as defined in ORS 830.700,  but does not rent the home, means the space rented and
not the manufactured dwelling, recreational vehicle or floating home itself.
(15) “Essential service” means:
(a) For  a tenancy not consisting of rental space for a manufactured dwelling, floating home or
recreational vehicle owned by the tenant and not otherwise subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850:
(A) Heat, plumbing, hot and cold running water, gas, electricity,  light fixtures, locks for exterior
doors, latches for windows and any cooking appliance or refrigerator  supplied or required to be
supplied by the landlord; and
(B) Any other  service or habitability obligation imposed by the rental agreement or ORS 90.320,
the lack or violation of which creates a serious threat to the tenant’s health,  safety or property or
makes the dwelling unit unfit for occupancy.
(b) For a tenancy consisting of rental space  for a manufactured dwelling, floating home or rec-
reational vehicle owned by the tenant or that is otherwise subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850:
(A) Sewage disposal, water supply, electrical supply and, if required by applicable law,  any
drainage system; and
(B) Any other  service or habitability obligation imposed by the rental agreement or ORS 90.730,
the lack or violation of  which creates a serious threat to the tenant’s health, safety or property or
makes the rented space unfit for occupancy.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 2
(16) “Facility” means a manufactured dwelling park or a marina.
(17) “Fee” means a nonrefundable payment of money.
(18) “First class mail” does not include certified or registered  mail, or any other form of mail
that may delay or hinder actual delivery of mail to the recipient.
(19) “Fixed term tenancy”  means a tenancy that has a fixed term of existence, continuing to a
specific ending date and terminating on that  date without requiring further notice to effect the
termination.
(20) “Floating home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.700. “Floating  home” includes
an accessory building or structure.
(21) “Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction concerned.
(22) “Hazard tree” means a tree that:
(a) Is located on a rented space in a manufactured dwelling park;
(b) Measures at least eight inches DBH; and
(c) Is considered, by an arborist  licensed as a landscape construction professional pursuant to
ORS 671.560 and certified by the International Society of Arboriculture, to pose  an unreasonable
risk of causing serious physical harm or damage to individuals or property in the near future.
(23) “Hotel or motel” means “hotel” as that term is defined in ORS 699.005.
(24) “Informal dispute  resolution” includes voluntary consultation between the landlord or
landlord’s agent and one or more tenants or voluntary mediation  utilizing the services of a third
party, but does not include mandatory mediation or arbitration.
(25) “Landlord” means the owner, lessor or sublessor of the dwelling unit or  the building or
premises of which it is a part. “Landlord” includes a person who is authorized by the owner, lessor
or sublessor to manage the premises or to enter into a rental agreement.
(26) “Landlord’s agent” means a  person who has oral or written authority, either express or
implied, to act for or on behalf of a landlord.
(27) “Last month’s rent  deposit” means a type of security deposit, however designated, the pri-
mary function of which is to secure the payment of rent for the last month of the tenancy.
(28) “Manufactured dwelling” means a residential trailer, a mobile home or  a manufactured
home as those terms are defined in ORS 446.003  or a prefabricated structure. “Manufactured
dwelling” includes an accessory building or structure.
(29) “Manufactured dwelling park” means a place where four or  more manufactured dwellings
are located, the primary purpose of which is to rent space or keep space for rent  to any person for
a charge or fee.
(30) “Marina” means a moorage of contiguous dwelling units that may be legally  transferred as
a single unit and are owned by one person where four or more floating homes are secured, the  pri-
mary purpose of which is to rent space or keep space for rent to any person for a charge or fee.
(31) “Marina purchase association”  means a group of three or more tenants who reside in a
marina and have organized for the purpose of eventual purchase of the marina.
(32) “Month-to-month tenancy” means a tenancy that automatically renews  and continues for
successive monthly periods  on the same terms and conditions originally agreed to, or as revised by
the parties, until terminated by one or both of the parties.
(33) “Organization” includes a corporation, government,  governmental subdivision or agency,
business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or com-
mon interest, and any other legal or commercial entity.
(34) “Owner”  includes a mortgagee in possession and means one or more persons, jointly or se-
verally, in whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All  or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the
premises.
(35) “Person” includes an individual or organization.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 3
(36) “Prefabricated structure” means a structure  that is substantially constructed or assembled
using closed construction at an off-site location in  compliance with the state building code and that
is sited and occupied by the owner in compliance with local codes.
(37) “Premises” means:
(a) A dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part and facilities and  appurtenances
therein;
(b) Grounds, areas and facilities held out for the  use of tenants generally or the use of which
is promised to the tenant; and
(c) A facility for manufactured dwellings or floating homes.
(38) “Prepaid rent” means any payment of  money to the landlord for a rent obligation not yet
due. In addition, “prepaid rent” means rent paid for a period extending beyond a termination date.
(39) “Recreational vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.101.
(40) “Recreational vehicle park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.492.
(41)(a) “Rent” means any payment to be made  to the landlord under the rental agreement, pe-
riodic or otherwise,  in exchange for the right of a tenant and any permitted pet to occupy a dwelling
unit to the exclusion of others and to use the premises.
(b) “Rent” does not include security deposits, fees or utility or service  charges as described in
ORS 90.315 (4) and 90.562.
(42) “Rental agreement” means all agreements, written  or oral, and valid rules and regulations
adopted under ORS 90.262 or 90.510 (6) embodying the  terms and conditions concerning the use and
occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises.  “Rental agreement” includes a lease. A rental agreement
is either a week-to-week tenancy, month-to-month tenancy or fixed term tenancy.
(43) “Roomer” means a person occupying a dwelling unit that does not include a toilet and  ei-
ther a bathtub or a shower and a refrigerator, stove and kitchen, all  provided by the landlord, and
where one or more of these facilities are used in common by occupants in the structure.
(44) “Screening or admission criteria” means  a written statement of any factors a landlord
considers in deciding whether to  accept or reject an applicant and any qualifications required for
acceptance. “Screening or admission criteria” includes, but is  not limited to, the rental history,
character references, public records, criminal records, credit reports, credit references  and incomes
or resources of the applicant.
(45) “Security deposit” means a refundable payment or deposit of  money, however designated,
the primary function of which is to secure the performance of a  rental agreement or any part of a
rental agreement. “Security deposit” does not include a fee.
(46) “Sexual assault” has the meaning given that term in ORS 147.450.
(47)(a) “Squatter” means a person occupying  a dwelling unit, or occupying any other property
and using it for dwelling purposes, who is  not so entitled under a rental agreement or who is not
authorized by the tenant to occupy that dwelling unit.
(b) “Squatter” does not include a tenant who holds over as described in ORS 90.427 (11).
(48) “Stalking” means the behavior described in ORS 163.732.
(49) “Statement of policy” means the summary explanation of information and facility  policies
to be provided to prospective and existing tenants under ORS 90.510.
(50) “Surrender” means an agreement, express  or implied, as described in ORS 90.148 between
a landlord and tenant to terminate a rental agreement that gave the  tenant the right to occupy a
dwelling unit.
(51) “Tenant”:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) Means a person, including a roomer, entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a  dwelling
unit to the  exclusion of others, including a dwelling unit owned, operated or controlled by a public
housing authority.
(B) Means a minor, as defined and provided for in ORS 109.697.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 4
(b) For purposes of ORS 90.505 to 90.850, means only a  person who owns and occupies as a
residence a manufactured dwelling or a floating home in a facility and persons  residing with that
tenant under the terms of the rental agreement.
(c) Does not mean a guest or temporary occupant.
(52)(a) “Tenant portal” means  any electronic application, software, website or digital
platform provided by or on behalf of a landlord that a  tenant, applicant or prospective ap-
plicant uses in connection  with applying for, establishing, maintaining or terminating a
tenancy.
(b) “Tenant portal” does not include communications with the landlord  or landlord’s
agent via email or text message.
[(52)] (53) “Transient lodging” means a room or a suite of rooms.
[(53)] (54)  “Transient occupancy” means occupancy in transient lodging that has all of the fol-
lowing  characteristics:
(a) Occupancy is charged on a daily basis and is not collected more than six days in advance;
(b) The lodging operator provides maid and linen service daily or every  two days as part of the
regularly charged cost of occupancy; and
(c) The period of occupancy does not exceed 30 days.
[(54)] (55)  “Vacation occupancy”  means occupancy in a dwelling unit, not including transient
occupancy in a hotel or motel, that:
(a) Has all of the following characteristics:
(A) The occupant rents the unit for vacation purposes only, not as a principal residence;
(B) The occupant has a principal residence other than at the unit; and
(C) The period of authorized occupancy does not exceed 45 days; or
(b) Is for the rental of a space in a recreational vehicle  park on which a recreational vehicle
owned by the occupant will be located and for which:
(A) The occupant rents the unit for vacation purposes only, not as a principal residence;
(B) The occupant has a principal residence other than at the space;
(C) The period of authorized occupancy does not exceed 90 days;
(D) The recreational vehicle is required to be removed from the park at the end  of the occu-
pancy period before a new occupancy may begin; and
(E) A written agreement is signed by the occupant  that substantially states: “Your occupancy
of this recreational vehicle park is  a vacation occupancy and is NOT subject to the Oregon Resi-
dential Landlord and Tenant Act (ORS chapter 90).”
[(55)] (56) “Victim” means:
(a) The person against whom an incident related to domestic  violence, sexual assault, bias crime
or stalking is perpetrated; or
(b) The parent or guardian of a  minor household member against whom an incident related to
domestic violence, sexual assault, bias crime or stalking is perpetrated, unless the parent  or guard-
ian is the perpetrator.
[(56)] (57) “Week-to-week tenancy” means a tenancy that  has all of the following characteristics:
(a) Occupancy  is charged on a weekly basis and is payable no less frequently than every seven
days;
(b) There is a written rental agreement that defines the landlord’s and  the tenant’s rights and
responsibilities under this chapter; and
(c) There are no fees or security deposits, although  the landlord may require the payment of an
applicant screening charge, as provided in ORS 90.295.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 90.302 is amended to read:
90.302. (1)  A landlord may not charge a fee at the beginning of the tenancy for an anticipated
landlord expense and may not require the  payment of any fee except as provided in this section.
A fee must be described in a written rental agreement.
(2) A landlord may charge a tenant a fee for each occurrence of the following:
(a) A late rent payment, pursuant to ORS 90.260.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 5
(b) A dishonored check, pursuant to ORS 30.701  (5). The amount of the fee may not exceed the
amount described in ORS 30.701  (5) plus any amount that a bank has charged the landlord for
processing the dishonored check.
(c) Removal or tampering with a properly functioning smoke alarm, smoke detector or  carbon
monoxide alarm, as provided in ORS 90.325 (2). The landlord may charge a fee of up to $250  unless
the State Fire Marshal assesses the tenant a civil penalty for  the conduct under ORS 479.990 or
under ORS 105.836 to 105.842 and 476.725.
(d) The violation of a written pet agreement or of a rule relating to pets in a facility,  pursuant
to ORS 90.530.
(e) The abandonment or relinquishment of a dwelling unit during a  fixed term tenancy without
cause. The fee may not exceed one and one-half times the monthly rent. A  landlord may not assess
a fee under this paragraph if the abandonment or relinquishment is pursuant to ORS  90.453 (2),
90.472 or 90.475. If the landlord assesses a fee under this paragraph:
(A) The landlord may not recover unpaid rent  for any period of the fixed term tenancy beyond
the date that the landlord knew or reasonably  should have known of the abandonment or
relinquishment;
(B) The landlord may not recover damages related to the cost of renting the dwelling unit  to a
new tenant; and
(C) ORS 90.410 (3) does not apply to the abandonment or relinquishment.
(3)(a) A landlord may charge a tenant  a fee under this subsection for a second noncompliance
or for a subsequent noncompliance with written rules or policies that  describe the prohibited con-
duct and the fee for a second noncompliance, and for any third or subsequent  noncompliance, that
occurs within one year after a written warning  notice described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph. Except as provided in paragraph (b)(G) or (H) of this subsection, the fee may  not exceed $50
for the second noncompliance  within one year after the warning notice for the same or a similar
noncompliance or $50 plus  five percent of the rent payment for the current rental period for a third
or subsequent noncompliance within  one year after the warning notice for the same or a similar
noncompliance. The landlord:
(A) Shall give a tenant a written warning notice that describes:
(i) A specific noncompliance before charging a fee for  a second or subsequent noncompliance for
the same or similar conduct; and
(ii) The amount of the fee for a second noncompliance, and for any subsequent  noncompliance,
that occurs within one year after the warning notice.
(B) Shall give a tenant a written notice describing  the noncompliance when assessing a fee for
a second or subsequent noncompliance that occurs within one year after the warning notice.
(C) Shall give a warning notice for a noncompliance or assess a fee for a second or subsequent
noncompliance within 30 days after the act constituting noncompliance.
(D) May terminate a tenancy for a noncompliance consistent with this chapter instead  of as-
sessing a fee under this subsection, but may not assess a fee and terminate a tenancy  for the same
noncompliance.
(E) May not  deduct a fee assessed pursuant to this subsection from a rent payment for the
current or a subsequent rental period.
(b) A landlord may charge a tenant a fee for occurrences of noncompliance with  written rules
or policies as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection for  the following types of noncompliance:
(A) The late payment of a utility or service charge that the tenant owes the landlord as  de-
scribed in ORS 90.315.
(B) Failure to clean up pet waste from a part of the premises other than the dwelling unit.
(C) Failure to clean up the waste of a service animal or a companion animal  from a part of the
premises other than the dwelling unit.
(D) Failure to clean up garbage, rubbish and other waste from a part of the premises  other than
the dwelling unit.
(E) Parking violations.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 6
(F) The improper use of vehicles within the premises.
(G) Smoking in a clearly designated nonsmoking unit or area of  the premises. The fee for a
second or any subsequent noncompliance under this subparagraph may not exceed $250. A landlord
may not assess this fee before 24 hours after the required warning notice to the tenant.
(H) Keeping on the premises an unauthorized pet capable of causing damage to persons  or
property, as described in ORS 90.405. The fee for a second or any subsequent noncompliance under
this subparagraph may not exceed $250. A landlord may not assess this fee  before 48 hours after the
required warning notice to the tenant.
(4) A landlord may not be required to account for or return to the tenant any fee.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (2)(e) of this  section, a landlord may not charge a tenant
any form of liquidated damages, however designated.
(6) Nonpayment of a fee  is not grounds for termination of a rental agreement for nonpayment
of rent under ORS 90.394, but is grounds for termination of a rental agreement for cause  under ORS
90.392 or 90.630 (1).
(7) This section does not apply to:
(a) Attorney fees awarded pursuant to ORS 90.255;
(b) Applicant screening charges paid pursuant to ORS 90.295;
(c) Charges for improvements or other actions that are requested by the tenant and are not re-
quired of the landlord by the  rental agreement or by law, including the cost to replace a key lost
by a tenant;
[(d) Processing  fees charged to the landlord by a credit card company and passed through to the
tenant for the use of a credit card by the tenant to make a payment when: ]
[(A) The credit card company  allows processing fees to be passed through to the credit card holder;
and]
[(B) The landlord allows the tenant to pay in cash or by check; ]
(d) Processing fees charged to the landlord, for a  payment made by a tenant by credit
or debit card or through  a tenant portal or other electronic means, and passed through to
the tenant, provided that:
(A) The payment processing company allows fees to be passed to the payor;
(B) The landlord allows the tenant  to pay by nonelectronic means as required under
section 3 (1) of this 2026 Act; and
(C) Records of fees charged to the landlord and passed through  to the tenant are made
available to the tenant upon written request within a reasonable time;
(e) A requirement by a landlord in a written  rental agreement that a tenant obtain and maintain
renter’s liability insurance pursuant to ORS 90.222; or
(f) Assessments, as defined  in ORS 94.550 and 100.005, for a dwelling unit that is within a
homeowners association organized under ORS 94.625 or an association of  unit owners organized
under ORS 100.405, respectively, if:
(A) The assessments are imposed by the association on a landlord who owns a dwelling unit
within the association and the landlord passes the assessments through to a tenant of the unit;
(B) The assessments are imposed by the  association on any person for expenses related to
moving into or out of a unit located within the association;
(C) The landlord sets forth  the assessment requirement in the written rental agreement at the
commencement of the tenancy; and
(D) The landlord gives a  copy of the assessment the landlord receives from the association to
the tenant before or at the time the landlord charges the tenant.
(8) If a landlord charges a tenant a fee in violation of  this section, the tenant may recover twice
the actual damages of the tenant or $300, whichever is greater. This penalty does not apply to  fees
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(9) The landlord may unilaterally amend a rental agreement  for a facility subject to ORS 90.505
to 90.850 to impose fees authorized by subsection (3) of this section upon a  90-day written notice to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 7
the tenant, except  that a marina landlord may not impose a noncompliance fee for parking under
subsection (3)(b)(E) of this section.
SECTION 6.  ORS 90.320 is amended to read:
90.320. (1) A landlord shall at all times  during the tenancy maintain the dwelling unit in a
habitable condition. For purposes of this section, a dwelling  unit shall be considered unhabitable if
it substantially lacks:
(a) Effective waterproofing and weather protection of  roof and exterior walls, including windows
and doors;
(b) Plumbing facilities that conform  to applicable law in effect at the time of installation and
are maintained in good working order;
(c) A water supply approved under applicable law that is:
(A) Under the  control of the tenant or landlord and is capable of producing hot and cold running
water;
(B) Furnished to appropriate fixtures;
(C) Connected to a sewage disposal system approved under applicable law; and
(D) Maintained so as to  provide safe drinking water and to be in good working order to the
extent that the system can be controlled by the landlord;
(d) Adequate heating facilities that conform to applicable law at the time of installation and are
maintained in good working order;
(e) Electrical lighting with wiring and electrical  equipment that conform to applicable law at
the time of installation and are maintained in good working order;
(f) Buildings, grounds and appurtenances at the time  of the commencement of the rental agree-
ment in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean,  sanitary and free from
all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin, and all areas under control
of the landlord kept in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean, sanitary
and free from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin;
(g) Except as otherwise provided  by local ordinance or by written agreement between the
landlord and the tenant, an adequate number of appropriate receptacles for garbage and  rubbish in
clean condition and good  repair at the time of the commencement of the rental agreement, and the
landlord shall provide and maintain appropriate serviceable receptacles thereafter  and arrange for
their removal;
(h) Floors, walls, ceilings, stairways and railings maintained in good repair;
(i) Ventilating,  air conditioning and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, main-
tained in good repair if supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;
(j) Safety from fire hazards, including  a working smoke alarm or smoke detector, with working
batteries if solely battery-operated, provided only at the beginning of any new tenancy when the
tenant first takes possession of the premises, as provided in ORS 479.270, but not to include  the
tenant’s testing of the smoke alarm or smoke detector as provided in ORS 90.325 (1);
(k) A carbon monoxide alarm, and the dwelling unit:
(A) Contains a carbon monoxide source; or
(B) Is  located within a structure that contains a carbon monoxide source and the dwelling unit
is connected to the room in  which the carbon monoxide source is located by a door, ductwork or
a ventilation shaft;
(L) Working locks for all dwelling entrance doors and latches for all windows, by which access
may be had to the dwelling unit;
(m) A means of unlocking locks under paragraph  (L) of this subsection, [ including access control
systems operated by a software application operated on a tenant’s mobile phone or other electronic de-
vice, provided that the landlord also offers the tenant at least one alternative means of access,
including] and of unlocking or otherwise accessing all common  areas or common facilities of
the premises to which the tenant has access, such as  an access code  or a fob, key card or other
tangible key  which must include at least one means other than a tenant portal ; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 8
(n) For a dwelling unit in a building where building permits for its construction  were issued on
or after April 1, 2024, adequate cooling facilities that:
(A) Provide cooling in at least one room of the dwelling unit, not including a bathroom;
(B) Conform to applicable law at the time of installation and are maintained in good  working
order; and
(C) May include central air conditioning, an air-source or ground-source heat pump or a portable
air conditioning device that is provided by the landlord.
(2) The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant is to perform specified  repairs,
maintenance tasks and minor remodeling only if:
(a) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and not for  the purpose of evading
the obligations of the landlord;
(b) The agreement does not diminish the obligations of the landlord to other  tenants in the
premises; and
(c) The terms and conditions of the agreement are  clearly and fairly disclosed and adequate
consideration for the agreement is specifically stated.
(3) Any provisions of this section that reasonably apply only to a structure  that is used as a
home, residence or sleeping place do not apply  to a manufactured dwelling, recreational vehicle or
floating home where the tenant owns the manufactured dwelling,  recreational vehicle or floating
home, rents  the space and, in the case of a dwelling or home, the space is not in a facility. Manu-
factured dwelling or floating home tenancies in which the tenant owns the  dwelling or home and
rents space in a facility are governed by ORS 90.730 and not by this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this 2026 Act and the amendments  to ORS 90.302 and
90.320 by sections 5 and 6 of  this 2026 Act apply to rental agreements entered into before,
on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2) Section 2 of this 2026 Act applies to applications for a rental agreement screened on
or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 26, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1523 (SB 1523-A) Page 9